Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.117.900

Construction—2007 c 314.

Nothing in this chapter may be construed to:

(1) Guarantee acceptance by, or entrance into, any institution of higher education; or

(2) Limit the participation of youth, in or formerly in, foster care in Washington state in any other program of financial assistance for postsecondary education.

[ 2007 c 314 s 9.]